Utah statutes.
16-10a-1420.   Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The division may commence a proceeding under Section 16-10a-1421 for administrative dissolution of a corporation if:

(1)  the corporation does not pay when they are due any taxes, fees, or penalties imposed by this chapter or other applicable laws of this state;

(2)  the corporation does not deliver a corporate or annual report to the division when it is due;

(3)  the corporation is without a registered agent in this state for 30 days or more;

(4)  the corporation does not give notice to the division within 30 days that its registered agent has been changed or that its registered agent has resigned; or

(5)  the corporation's period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation expires.



Amended by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

